Texas statutes.
OCCUPATIONS CODE

TITLE 3. HEALTH PROFESSIONS

SUBTITLE D. DENTISTRY

CHAPTER 253. EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR AND PERSONNEL

Sec. 253.001. EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR. (a) The board may employ an executive director to assist the board in performing its duties.

(b) The board shall set the executive director's salary.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 253.003. PERSONNEL. (a) The executive director, with the board's consent, may employ an assistant executive director to perform the executive director's duties when the executive director is absent or unable to act.

(b) The board may employ:

(1) committees, clerks, advisors, consultants, dentists, hygienists, or examiners to assist the board in performing its duties; and

(2) other persons determined necessary:

(A) to assist the local prosecuting officers of a county in the enforcement of state laws prohibiting the unlawful practice of dentistry; and

(B) to carry out other purposes for which funds are appropriated.

(c) The board shall employ other employees as needed to assist the executive director in performing the executive director's duties and in carrying out the purposes of this subtitle.

(d) A person assisting a local prosecuting officer under this section is subject to the direction and control of the prosecuting officer. This subsection does not change the authority granted by law to the prosecuting officer.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.073(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 253.004. DIVISION OF RESPONSIBILITIES. The board shall develop and implement policies that clearly define the responsibilities of the board and the staff of the board.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 253.005. QUALIFICATIONS AND STANDARDS OF CONDUCT INFORMATION. The board shall provide, as often as necessary, to its members and employees information regarding:

(1) qualifications for office or employment under this subtitle; and

(2) responsibilities under applicable laws relating to standards of conduct for state officers or employees.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 253.006. CAREER LADDER PROGRAM; PERFORMANCE EVALUATIONS. (a) The executive director or the executive director's designee shall develop an intra-agency career ladder program. The program must require the intra-agency postings of all nonentry level positions concurrently with any public posting.

(b) The executive director or the executive director's designee shall develop a system of annual performance evaluations. All merit pay for board employees must be based on the system established under this subsection.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 253.007. EQUAL OPPORTUNITY POLICY; REPORT. (a) The executive director or the executive director's designee shall prepare and maintain a written policy statement to ensure implementation of an equal employment opportunity program under which all personnel transactions are made without regard to race, color, disability, sex, religion, age, or national origin. The policy statement must include:

(1) personnel policies, including policies relating to recruitment, evaluation, selection, appointment, training, and promotion of personnel that are in compliance with requirements of Chapter 21, Labor Code;

(2) a comprehensive analysis of the board workforce that meets federal and state guidelines;

(3) procedures by which a determination can be made of significant underuse in the board workforce of all persons for whom federal or state guidelines encourage a more equitable balance; and

(4) reasonable methods to appropriately address those areas of significant underuse.

(b) A policy statement prepared under Subsection (a) must:

(1) cover an annual period;

(2) be updated annually;

(3) be reviewed by the Commission on Human Rights for compliance with Subsection (a)(1); and

(4) be filed with the governor.

(c) The governor shall deliver a biennial report to the legislature based on the information received under Subsection (b). The report may be made separately or as a part of other biennial reports made to the legislature.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.